California statutes. Water Code
The San Bernardino County Flood Control District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation, required by the act of Congress approved October 27, 1965, Public Law 89-298, 79 Stat. 1073, Title II, the “Flood Control Act of 1965,” will be furnished by the district in connection with the plan of improvement for flood control adopted and authorized in Section 12681.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1577.)
-------------------------------------------

12681.3.

The San Bernardino County Flood Control District, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plan of improvement for flood control referred to in Section 12681.1 and exercise all powers granted to it in the San Bernardino County Flood Control Act (Chapter 73, Statutes of 1939), and the district may make such modifications or amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and 2 (commencing with Section 12639) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1577.)
-------------------------------------------

12682.

The general comprehensive plan for flood control in the basins of the Los Angeles and San Gabriel Rivers and Ballona Creek are adopted and authorized as set forth in House Document Numbered 838, Seventy-sixth Congress, Third Session, and approved in the act of Congress approved August 18, 1941, at an estimated cost to the State of twenty-two million five hundred thousand dollars ($22,500,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12683.

The Los Angeles County Flood Control District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of War that the local cooperation, required by Section 3 of the act of Congress approved December 22, 1944 (Public, Numbered 534, Seventy-eighth Congress, Second Session) and Section 2 of the act of Congress approved August 18, 1941 (Public, Numbered 228, Seventy-eighth Congress, First Session), will be furnished by the Los Angeles County Flood Control District in connection with the plan for flood control adopted and authorized in Section 12682.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12684.

The Los Angeles County Flood Control District, in conjunction with the War Department, shall execute the plans and projects referred to in Section 12682 and exercise all powers granted to it in the Los Angeles County Flood Control Act, and the district may make such modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 and 2 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12684.2.

(a) The project for flood control in the Los Angeles County Drainage Area (LACDA), known as the LACDA project, is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the approval of the Congress of the United States as indicated in, and the report of the Chief of Engineers dated June 30, 1992, and any supplement or addendum to that report that results from discussions between interested parties, as authorized by, Section 101(b) of the Water Resources Development Act of 1990 (Public Law
 101-640), at an estimated cost to the state of the sum that may be appropriated by the Legislature for state cooperation, upon the recommendation and advice of the department, in an amount that may not exceed 60 percent of the nonfederal costs of the project.

(b) The authorization of the project is contingent upon the adoption by Los Angeles County of a plan to undertake restoration projects, including related habitat restoration and maintenance projects, along the entire length of the Los Angeles River and related tributaries and to increase parkland and recreational opportunities along that river. For the purposes of preparing and implementing the plan, the county shall consider the comments of the advisory committee convened pursuant to subdivision (c).

(c) The Secretary of the Resources Agency shall convene an advisory committee, comprised of experts and representatives of
 organizations involved in river restoration, habitat restoration, and community development relating to the Los Angeles River, to provide input to the secretary and the County of Los Angeles in the preparation and implementation of the plan.

(d) The authorization of the project is contingent upon a determination by the Secretary of the Resources Agency and the Los Angeles County Board of Supervisors, after a public hearing, that the project described in subdivision (a) is a multipurpose project that includes, in addition to flood control features, river restoration, wildlife and habitat restoration, or park and recreational features.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1071, second Sec. 4 (Sec. 15).   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12684.4.

The Los Angeles County Flood Control District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation required by the Water Resources Development Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-640), will be furnished by the district in connection with the project for flood control adopted and authorized in Section 12684.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1071, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12684.6.

The Los Angeles County Flood Control District, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall carry out the plans and project described in Section 12684.2 and the district may make modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to carry out the project for the purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1071, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12684.8.

The Secretary of the Resources Agency shall consult with appropriate federal agencies to assess the desirability, feasibility, and costs of modifying the flood control project described in Section 12684.2, in accordance with Section 2309a of Title 33 of the United States Code or other relevant law, to include multipurpose features designed to maximize river habitat restoration, parkland, and recreational opportunities consistent with flood control objectives. The secretary shall prepare and submit a report to the Legislature, not later than March 1, 2001,
 concerning the results of the consultation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1071, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12685.

The plan of improvement for flood protection on the Pajaro River and tributaries is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 505, Seventy-eighth Congress, Second Session, at an estimated cost to the State of two hundred ninety-four thousand eight hundred forty dollars ($294,840).

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12686.

The Counties of Santa Clara, Santa Cruz, and San Benito and the Monterey County Flood Control and Water Conservation District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of War that the local cooperation required by Section 3 of the act of Congress approved December 22, 1944 (Public, Numbered 534, Seventy-eighth Congress, Second Session), will be furnished by the counties and the district in connection with the flood control project authorized and adopted in Section 12685.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12687.

The Counties of Santa Clara, Santa Cruz, and San Benito and the Monterey County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, in conjunction with the War Department, shall execute the plans and projects referred to in Section 12685, and may make such modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 and 2 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12687.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 12585.7, the state may provide subvention of funds, up to 100 percent of the costs, for the project for flood control on the Pajaro River in the Counties of Monterey and Santa Cruz, authorized by the federal Flood Control Act of 1966 (Public Law 89-789), that is substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers of the United States Army Corps of Engineers in House Document 491, 89th Congress, to the Counties of Monterey and Santa Cruz, or to local agencies in those counties, as follows:

(1) At an estimated cost to the state of the sum that may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendations and advice of the department.

(2) Upon a specific written determination by the department that the project meets the requirements of Section 12582.7.

(b) The state assumes no liability for damages that may result from the project by either of the following:

(1) Authorizing the provision of subvention funds in accordance with this section.

(2) The appropriation by the Legislature of these subvention funds upon the recommendations and advice of the department.

(c) The County of Monterey or Santa Cruz, or a local agency in either of those counties, may receive the subvention funds only if it enters into an agreement with the department pursuant to which the county or local agency agrees to indemnify and hold and save harmless the state, its officers, agents, and employees
 for any and all liability for damages that may result from the project.

(d) State funding, upon appropriation by the Legislature, may be used for planning, engineering, designing, and constructing the project within authorized project boundaries as set forth in the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers of the United States Army Corps of Engineers in House Document 491, 89th Congress, as authorized by the federal Flood Control Act of 1966 (Public Law 89-789). The state, through the Flood Control Subventions Program, may advance funds for the planning, engineering, design, and construction of the authorized project, and the acquisition of required lands, easements, rights-of-way, utility relocations, disposal sites, and borrow areas for, and mitigation of, the authorized project, as specified in the Army Corps of Engineers report entitled Pajaro River Flood Risk Management General Reevaluation Report & Integrated Environmental Assessment.
 The state shall have the discretion to reduce retention withheld under any cost-share agreement to fund the Pajaro River Flood Risk Management Project to 0 percent and is authorized to advance funding in the absence, in whole or in part, of federal funding, in which case the funding shall not exceed the amount that would be the equivalent nonfederal share if there was federal project funding.

(e) Before any funds appropriated by the Legislature are provided to the flood control project, the Director of Water Resources shall find both of the following:

(1) The project qualifies for greater than a 100 percent state cost share based upon the gross calculation of the cumulative benefits the project provides as described in a nonfederal cost-share report submitted to the department for the project.

(2) The project spans
 more than one county, contains significant state assets, and widespread economic hardship exists throughout the benefit area of the project, as demonstrated in a nonfederal cost-share report submitted to the department for the project, and the project would aid in the restoration of a groundwater aquifer.

(f) For purposes of this section, “liability for damages” includes, but is not limited to, liability for damages relating to the construction or operation of the project or the failure of the project to operate as intended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 220.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12687.6.

(a) The state may provide subvention funds in accordance with Section 12585.7 to the County of Orange for the Westminster, East Garden Grove, California Flood Risk Management project, which is authorized by Section 401 of the federal Water Resources Development Act of 2020 (Division AA of Public Law 116-260), and that is substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers of the United States Army Corps of Engineers Report, dated July 9, 2020, as follows:

(1) At an estimated cost to the state of the sum that may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendations and advice of the department.

(2) Upon a specific written
 determination by the department that the project meets the requirements of Section 12582.7.

(b) The state assumes no liability for damages that may result from the project by either of the following:

(1) Authorizing the provision of subvention funds in accordance with this section.

(2) The appropriation by the Legislature of the subvention funds upon the recommendations and advice of the department.

(c) The County of Orange may receive subvention funds under this section only if it enters into an agreement with the department pursuant to which the county agrees to indemnify and hold and save harmless the state and its officers, agents, and employees for any and all liability for damages that may result from the project.

(d) For purposes of this section, “liability for damages” includes, but is not limited to, liability for damages relating to the construction or operation of the project or the failure of the project to operate as intended.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 302, Sec. 1.   (AB 781)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12688.

The program on the Los Angeles River Watershed is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendation of the Under Secretary of Agriculture in House Document Numbered 426, Seventy-seventh Congress, First Session, at an estimated cost to the State of one million eight hundred eighty-two thousand dollars ($1,882,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12689.

The Los Angeles County Flood Control District shall give the necessary assurances that the local cooperation required by the United States on the program mentioned in Section 12688 will be furnished by the district. It shall be the duty of the district to execute the plan with the United States and exercise all powers granted to it in the Los Angeles County Flood Control Act, and the district may make such modifications and amendments to the program as may be necessary to execute it for the purposes of Chapters 1 and 2 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12690.

The program on the Santa Ynez River Watershed is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Acting Secretary of Agriculture in House Document Numbered 518, Seventy-eighth Congress, Second Session, and approved by the act of Congress approved December 22, 1944, Public Law 534, Seventy-eighth Congress, Second Session, and as further authorized by act of Congress approved May 17, 1951, Public Law 516, Eighty-first Congress, Second Session, at an estimated cost to the State of one hundred six thousand dollars ($106,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12691.

The County of Santa Barbara shall give the necessary assurances that the local cooperation required by the United States on the program mentioned in Section 12690 will be furnished by the county. The county shall execute the plan with the United States, and may make such modifications and amendments to the program as may be necessary to execute it for the purposes of Chapters 1 and 2 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12692.

Consent is hereby given to the acquisition of lands by the United States for the purposes within the scope of Section 13 of the act of Congress approved December 22, 1944 (Public, Numbered 534, Seventy-eighth Congress, Second Session), in connection with the programs adopted and authorized in Sections 12688 and 12690. There shall be paid annually by the United States to the county in which any land acquired may lie, a sum equal to 1 percent of the purchase price paid for the lands, or, if not acquired by purchase, 1 percent of their valuation at the time of their acquisition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12693.

The project on the San Diego River for flood protection at San Diego is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 635, Seventy-seventh Congress, Second Session, without cost to the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12694.

The work of improvement on the San Diego River and Mission Bay, San Diego County, is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the report of the Chief of Engineers dated May 8, 1946, at an estimated cost to the State of one million eight hundred twenty-six thousand dollars ($1,826,000), and the work is found to be a work for the control of floods.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12695.

The City of San Diego shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation, required by Section 1 of the act of Congress approved July 24, 1946 (Public, Numbered 525, Seventy-ninth Congress, Second Session), will be furnished by the city in connection with the flood control project adopted and authorized in Section 12694.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12696.

The City of San Diego, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plans and projects referred to in Section 12694, and the city may make such modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 and 2 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12697.

The project for the Conn Creek Reservoir on Conn Creek for flood control and other purposes in the Napa River Basin is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 626, Seventy-eighth Congress, without cost to the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12698.

The project on the Russian River for flood protection and water conservation in Sonoma and Mendocino Counties is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document No. 585, Eighty-first Congress, Second Session, as authorized by act of Congress approved May 17, 1950, Public Law 516, Eighty-first Congress, Second Session, at an estimated cost to the State of such sum as may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department, when funds for carrying out the project are appropriated by Congress.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12699.

The Sonoma County Flood Control and Water Conservation District and the Mendocino County Russian River Flood Control and Water Conservation Improvement District, or either such agency as appropriate, shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation, required by Section 201 of the act of Congress approved May 17, 1950 (Public Law 516, 81st Congress, Second Session), will be furnished by the districts in connection with the plan of flood control adopted and authorized in Section 12698.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 685.)
-------------------------------------------

12700.

The Sonoma County Flood Control and Water Conservation District and the Mendocino County Russian River Flood Control and Water Conservation Improvement District, or either such agency as appropriate, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plans and projects referred to in Section 12698 and exercise all powers granted by law to the districts, and the districts may make such modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 and 2 of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 685.)
-------------------------------------------

12701.

The project on San Lorenzo Creek in Alameda County for flood control and allied purposes is hereby adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 452, Eighty-third Congress, Second Session, as authorized by act of Congress approved September 3, 1954, Public Law 780, Eighty-third Congress, Second Session, at an estimated cost to the State of such sum as may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department, when funds for carrying out said project are appropriated by Congress.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12702.

The Alameda County Flood Control and Water Conservation District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation, required by the act of Congress approved September 3, 1954 (Public Law 780, Eighty-third Congress, Second Session) will be furnished by the district in connection with the plan of flood control adopted and authorized in Section 12701.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1042.)
-------------------------------------------

12703.

The Alameda County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plans and projects referred to in Section 12701 and exercise all powers granted to it in the Alameda County Flood Control and Water Conservation District Act, and the district may make modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 and 2 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1042.)
-------------------------------------------

12704.

The project for flood protection on San Lorenzo River in Santa Cruz County is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 447, Eighty-third Congress, Second Session, as authorized by act of Congress approved September 3, 1954, Chapter 1264, Public Law 780, Eighty-third Congress, Second Session (Title II, the “Flood Control Act of 1954”), at an estimated cost to the State of such sum as may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department, when funds for carrying out the project are appropriated by Congress; provided, that the
 requirement that local interests make a cash contribution to the United States equal to 8.9 percent of the project cost, is for payment of local benefits not related to flood control, and shall not be payable or reimbursable by the State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12705.

The City of Santa Cruz shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation required by the Federal Flood Control Act of 1954 will be furnished by the city in connection with the plan of flood control adopted and authorized in Section 12704.

(History: Added by Stats. 1956, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

12706.

The City of Santa Cruz, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plans and projects referred to in Section 12704, and the city may make such modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 and 2 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1956, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

12706.3.

(a) The project for flood control on the San Lorenzo River is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with congressional approval and the final report of the Chief of Engineers dated June 30, 1994, as authorized by Section 101 (a) (5) of the Water Resources Development Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-303), as amended, at an estimated cost to the state of the sum that may be appropriated for state cooperation by statute, upon the recommendation and advice of the department.

(b) The City of Santa Cruz shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation required by that final report will be furnished by the city in connection with the project for flood control.

(c) (1) The City of Santa Cruz, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall carry out the project referred to in subdivision (a) and may make modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to carry out the plans for the purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12750) and this chapter.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 12639, if there are any major modifications or amendments to the plans that result in a substantial increase in the costs to the state for any estimated cost for the project, no money shall be reallocated by the state in aid of that portion of the project until the revised plans have been reviewed and approved by the department. The department shall approve the revised plans if the department determines that the benefits of the proposed works of improvement for the revised project will exceed the cost thereof and that the
 revised project appears to be the most economical project plan, considering construction costs, land costs, easements and rights-of-way costs, and operation and maintenance costs.

(d) State funding for the project is contingent on the provision of funds for that purpose in either the annual Budget Act or a general obligation bond act. Reimbursement of the state share of the nonfederal costs of the project shall be for those project costs incurred on or after October 12, 1996, the date on which the project was authorized by Congress, as set forth in Section 101(a)(5) of the Water Resources Development Act of 1996 Public Law 104-303).

(e) State funding, available upon appropriation by the Legislature, may be used within the authorized project boundaries as set forth in the final report of the Chief of Engineers dated June 30, 1994, as authorized by Section 101(a)(5) of the Water
 Resources Development Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-303), as amended. The state, through the Flood Control Subventions Program, may fund construction of the final phase of the authorized project, as specified in the Army Corps of Engineers report entitled San Lorenzo River Stable Channel Design, March 27, 2015, when there are not available federal funds for project completion. The funding for project completion shall be 70 percent from the state and 30 percent from the local project sponsor, except that the state share shall not exceed the equivalent state share if there was federal project funding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 166, Sec. 1.   (AB 436)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12707.

The plan of improvement for flood control, levee, and channel improvements on the Santa Maria River and its tributaries is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 400, Eighty-third Congress, Second Session, as authorized by act of Congress approved September 3, 1954, Public Law 780, Eighty-third Congress, Second Session, at an estimated cost to the State of one million two hundred sixteen thousand dollars ($1,216,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

12708.

The County of Santa Barbara shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation, required by the act of Congress approved September 3, 1954 (Public Law 780, Eighty-third Congress, Second Session), will be furnished by the county in connection with the plan of flood control adopted and authorized in Section 12707.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

12709.

The County of Santa Barbara, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plans and projects referred to in Section 12707, and may make modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 (commencing at Section 12570) and 2 (commencing at Section 12639) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

12710.

The plan for channel improvements and appurtenant works for flood control on that portion of the Truckee River and tributaries within the State of California, is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document No. 497, Eighty-third Congress, Second Session, as authorized by Act of Congress approved September 3, 1954, Public Law 780, Eighty-third Congress, Second Session, at an estimated cost to the State of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 84.)
-------------------------------------------

12711.

The department shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local co-operation required by the Act of Congress approved September 3, 1954, Public Law 780, Eighty-third Congress, Second Session, will be furnished by the State in connection with the plan for flood control adopted and authorized in Section 12710.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 84.)
-------------------------------------------

12712.

In conformance with the duty prescribed in Section 12642, it shall be the responsibility and duty of local public agencies, now existing or hereafter formed, including counties and public districts, affected by the plan for flood control adopted and authorized in Section 12710, to give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army and the department that such local public agencies will maintain and operate said flood control works after their completion and hold and save the State and the United States free from damage due to the construction and operation of said works.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 84.)
-------------------------------------------

12713.

The project for flood protection on the Eel River, in the Sandy Prairie region, is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 80, 85th Congress, as authorized by act of Congress approved July 3, 1958 (Public Law 85-500, 72 Stat. 297, Title II, the “Flood Control Act of 1958”), at such estimated cost to the State as may be appropriated for state co-operation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 217.)
-------------------------------------------

12714.

The County of Humboldt shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local co-operation, required by Section 201 of the Act of Congress approved July 3, 1958 (Public Law 85-500, 72 Stat. 297, Title II, the “Flood Control Act of 1958”), will be furnished by the county in connection with the project for flood protection adopted and authorized in Section 12713.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 217.)
-------------------------------------------

12715.

The County of Humboldt, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plans and projects referred to in Section 12713, and may make modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 (commencing at Section 12570) and 2 (commencing at Section 12639) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 217.)
-------------------------------------------

12716.

The project for flood protection on Walnut Creek in Contra Costa County is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 76, 86th Congress, First Session, as authorized by Act of Congress approved July 14, 1960 (Public Law 86-645, 74 Stat. 480, Title II, the “Flood Control Act of 1960”) at an estimated cost to the State of such sum as may be appropriated for state co-operation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department, when funds for carrying out the project are appropriated by Congress; provided, that the requirement that local interests make a cash contribution to
 the United States equal to 7.4 percent of the project cost is for payment of local benefits not related to flood control and shall not be payable or reimbursable by the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 211.)
-------------------------------------------

12717.

The Contra Costa County Flood Control and Water Conservation District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local co-operation required by the Act of Congress approved July 14, 1960 (Public Law 86-645, 74 Stat. 480, Title II, the “Flood Control Act of 1960”), will be furnished by the district in connection with the project for flood control adopted and authorized in Section 12716.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 211.)
-------------------------------------------

12718.

The Contra Costa County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plans and projects referred to in Section 12716 and exercise all powers granted to it in the Contra Costa County Flood Control and Water Conservation District Act (Chapter 1617, Statutes of 1951), and the district may make such modifications or amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and 2 (commencing with Section 12639) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 211.)
-------------------------------------------

12718.1.

The project for flood control on Alhambra Creek in Contra Costa County is hereby adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 336, 90th Congress, as adopted and authorized by the Act of Congress approved August 13, 1968 (Public Law 90-483, 82 Stat. 731, 739, Title II, the Flood Control Act of 1968), at an estimated cost to the state of such sum as may be appropriated for state co-operation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department. This authorization shall not be deemed to confer preference on this project over the needs of other statewide programs in
 appropriations of available funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 74.)
-------------------------------------------

12718.2.

The Contra Costa County Flood Control and Water Conservation District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation, required by the Act of Congress approved August 13, 1968 (Public Law 90-483, 82 Stat. 731, 739, Title II, the Flood Control Act of 1968), will be furnished by the district in connection with the project for flood control adopted and authorized in Section 12718.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 74.)
-------------------------------------------

12718.3.

The Contra Costa County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plans and projects referred to in Section 12718.1, and may make modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and 2 (commencing with Section 12639) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 74.)
-------------------------------------------

12719.

The project for flood protection on Tahchevah Creek, Whitewater River Basin, at and in the vicinity of Palm Springs in Riverside County, is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 171, 86th Congress, as authorized by Act of Congress approved July 14, 1960 (Public Law 86-645, 74 Stat. 480, Title II, the “Flood Control Act of 1960”), at an estimated cost to the State of such sum as may be appropriated for state co-operation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department, when funds for carrying out the project are appropriated by Congress.

(History: Added by Stats. 1962, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

12720.

The Riverside County Flood Control and Water Conservation District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local co-operation required by the Act of Congress approved July 14, 1960 (Public Law 86-645, 74 Stat. 480, Title II, the “Flood Control Act of 1960”), will be furnished by the district in connection with the project for flood control adopted and authorized in Section 12719.

(History: Added by Stats. 1962, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

12721.

The Riverside County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plans and projects referred to in Section 12719 and exercise all powers granted to it in the Riverside County Flood Control and Water Conservation District Act (Chapter 1122, Statutes of 1945), and the district may make such modifications or amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and 2 (commencing with Section 12639) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1962, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

12721.5.

(a) The project for flood control on the Santa Ana River at Norco Bluffs is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the final report of the Chief of Engineers of the United States Army Corps of Engineers dated December 23, 1996, as authorized by Section 101(b)(4) of the Water Resources Development Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-303), at an estimated cost to the state of the sum that may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature, upon the recommendation and advice of the department.

(b) The Riverside County Flood Control and Water Conservation District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation required by the final report of the Chief of Engineers of the United States Army Corps of Engineers dated December 23, 1996, will be furnished by the district in connection with the project for flood control adopted and authorized in subdivision (a).

(c) The district, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall carry out the plans and project and may make modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to carry out the plans for the purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1071, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12721.7.
